Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1046
Practitioner, defined.

Practitioner means a person who performs any or all of the practices of cosmetology, nail technology, esthetics, or electrology for compensation or who performs any or all of the practices of body art.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 25;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 12;

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 19;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 13;

Laws 2004, LB 906, § 14;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-364;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 308.